Washington statutes.
RCW 43.114.050

Duties of commission—State agencies to give assistance.

(1) The commission shall have the following duties:

(a) Actively recruit and maintain a list of names of qualified LGBTQ people to fill vacancies on various boards and commissions;

(b) Provide a clearinghouse for information regarding both state and federal legislation as it relates to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) Identify and define specific needs of LGBTQ:

(i) People of color;

(ii) People with developmental disabilities;

(iii) Seniors;

(iv) People experiencing homelessness;

(v) Economic and small business development; and

(vi) Veterans, their spouses, and dependents;

(d) Consult with state agencies regarding the effect of agency policies, procedures, practices, laws, and administrative rules on the unique problems and needs of LGBTQ people. The commission shall also provide any data, input, and recommendations to state agencies on proposed agency rules and the development and implementation of comprehensive and coordinated policies, plans, and programs focusing on those problems and needs;

(e) Provide resource and referral information to agencies and the public. The commission may gather data and disseminate information to the public in order to implement the purposes of this chapter;

(f) Consult with nonprofit organizations;

(g) Hold public hearings to gather input on issues related to the unique problems and needs of LGBTQ people;

(h) Advocate for removal of barriers for LGBTQ people; and

(i) Review best practices for discrimination and harassment policies and training and provide recommendations to state agencies as they update their discrimination and harassment policies. The commission shall also maintain a file of discrimination and harassment policies that meet high quality standards and make these files available for agency use.

(2) The commission must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor every two years detailing the commission's activities. The report submitted must be in electronic format pursuant to RCW 43.01.036, and include, at minimum:

(a) Recommendations for addressing the needs identified under subsection (1)(c) of this section;

(b) Input received during public hearings and recommendations for addressing the problems and needs discussed at the public hearings; and

(c) Recommendations regarding preserving the memory and contributions of LGBTQ members lost to HIV/AIDS in Washington state.

(3) State agencies must provide appropriate and reasonable assistance to the commission as needed, including providing notice of agency proposed rule making and gathering data and information, including but not limited to voluntary demographics, economic disparity studies, and other collectable data by state agencies, in order for the commission to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

[ 2019 c 395 s 6.]